Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Adult Protection
71-6-126. Elder abuse task force.

There is created the elder abuse task force.

The task force is to consist of the following members:

The executive director of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability or the executive director's designee;

The commissioner of human services, or the commissioner's designee with knowledge of the responsibilities of the adult protective service program;

The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of financial institutions or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

A district attorney general selected by the district attorneys general conference;

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the director's designee;

A representative of the Tennessee Bankers Association;

A representative of the Tennessee Credit Union League; and

A representative of the Tennessee Health Care Association.

The task force shall:

Assess the current status of elders and other vulnerable adults covered by the Tennessee Adult Protection Act related to financial exploitation, compiled in this part;

Examine the existing barriers, services, and resources addressing the needs of these elder persons and vulnerable adults; and

Develop recommendations to address problems associated with the financial exploitation of these elder persons and vulnerable adults.

The task force shall include an examination of the following in its assessment and recommendations:

A determination of the economic and human impact of financial exploitation of elder persons and vulnerable adults in Tennessee;

A review of the remedies to reduce the number of individuals suffering such abuse;

Legislative remedies for consideration in the 112th general assembly; and

Needed state policies or responses, including directions for the provision of clear and coordinated services and support to protect and assist such persons.

Members of the task force serve without compensation or reimbursement for any expenses incurred while participating in the business of the task force.

The appointing authorities shall strive to be inclusive in selecting persons to serve on the task force to best reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban and rural, and economic diversity of the state.

The executive director of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability shall call the first meeting of the task force, at which time the members shall elect a chair and vice chair.

The commission on aging and disability shall provide necessary administrative support for the task force. The chair of the task force may call on appropriate state agencies for reasonable assistance relating to the work of the task force.

The task force shall hold public meetings and utilize technological means, such as webcasts, to gather feedback on the recommendations from the general public and from persons and families affected by poverty.

The task force shall submit its findings and recommendations to the governor and the general assembly in the form of a state plan to combat the abuse of elder persons and other vulnerable adults no later than January 15, 2021, at which time the task force terminates and stands dissolved and discharged from any further duties.

Acts 2019, ch. 135, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 135, § 2. April 9, 2019.